Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB783.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 introductory paragraph, (1.1) and (4)(xxi) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, are amended, clause (4) is amended by adding subclauses and the section is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act[.]:* * *(1.1) "Internet service provider" means a person who furnishes a service that enables users to access content, information, electronic mail or other services offered over the 12345678910111213141516171819 Internet, and access to proprietary content, information and other services as part of a package of services offered to [consumers] the public.* * *(4) "Unfair methods of competition" and "unfair or deceptive acts or practices" mean any one or more of the following:* * *[(xxi) Engaging in any other fraudulent or deceptive conduct which creates a likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding.](xxii) Making an untruthful, deceptive or misleading environmental marketing claim, including, for example:(A) engaging in paltering that misleads or deceives consumers as to the overall environmental impact of an industry, business, product or service; or(B) engaging in reputational advertising that misleads or deceives consumers as to the overall environmental impact of an industry, business, product or service.(xxiii) Making an untruthful, deceptive or misleading net zero claim, including a claim that:(A) does not clearly identify the covered portion of an entity's emission portfolio and value chain, including all greenhouse gas emissions, all emission scopes and all joint ventures, subsidiaries and specific product categories;(B) does not distinguish between a business's emission reductions, post-emission compensation, both offsets and removals, and emission divestments or otherwise relies on vast amounts of offsets; or(C) is not substantiated by a company plan or action.(xxiv) Engaging in any other fraudulent or deceptive conduct which creates a likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding.20250HB0783PN0804 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(14) "Environmental marketing claim" means a representation about the environmental attribute, including climate impact, of a product or service in connection with the marketing, offering for sale or sale of the product or service to the public. For purposes of this definition, marketing includes labeling, advertising, promotional materials and any other form of appeal to the public in any medium, whether asserted directly or by implication, through words, symbols, logos, depictions, product brand names or other means.(15) "Net zero claim" means a representation that an entity has achieved an overall balance between greenhouse gas emissions produced and greenhouse gas emissions removed from the atmosphere.(16) "Paltering" means the use of a truthful statement relating to an industry, business, product or service that creates an overall false, deceptive or misleading impression or implication to the public that a specific benefit is significant when it is in fact negligible as to the industry, business, product or service.(17) "Reputational advertising" means a representation to the public designed to create a perception of an industry, business or brand by highlighting positive environmental qualities of or action taken by the industry, business or brand, regardless of whether the representation is made in connection with the sale of a good or service.Section 2. Sections 3(a) and 9.2 of the act are amended to read:Section 3. Unlawful Acts or Practices; Exclusions.--(a) Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or 20250HB0783PN0804 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce as defined by [subclauses (i) through (xxi) of] clause (4) of section 2 of this act and regulations promulgated under section 3.1 of this act are hereby declared unlawful. The provisions of this act shall not apply to any owner, agent or employe of any radio or television station, or to any owner, publisher, printer, agent or employe of an Internet service provider or a newspaper or other publication, periodical or circular, who, in good faith and without knowledge of the falsity or deceptive character thereof, publishes, causes to be published or takes part in the publication of such advertisement.* * *Section 9.2. Private Actions.--(a) Any person who purchases or leases goods or services primarily for personal, family or household purposes and thereby suffers any ascertainable loss of money or property, real or personal, as a result of the use or employment by any person of a method, act or practice declared unlawful by section 3 of this act, may bring a private action to recover actual damages or one hundred dollars ($100), whichever is greater. If an action is brought under this section alleging an unfair or deceptive act or practice described in subclauses (xxii) or (xxiii) of clause (4) of section 2 of this act, it shall not be required that the person who brought the action suffered any ascertainable loss as a result of the use or employment of the unfair or deceptive act or practice. The court may, in its discretion, award up to three times the actual damages sustained, but not less than one hundred dollars ($100), and may provide such additional relief as it deems necessary or proper. The court may award to the plaintiff, in addition to other relief provided in this section, costs and reasonable 20250HB0783PN0804 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attorney fees.(b) Any permanent injunction, judgment or order of the court made under section 4 of this act shall be prima facie evidence in an action brought under section 9.2 of this act that the defendant used or employed acts or practices declared unlawful by section 3 of this act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0783PN0804 - 5 - 1234567